test/src/morphology/myv-tests_gt-norm.yaml
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетневгак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетненеккак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьседеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсекскак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсеськак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсентькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Def.Sg+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсентеньгак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьседентькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсесэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсестэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсевантькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсевтементькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсешкантькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсексэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетненьгак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнененьгак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнедеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнесэяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнестэяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнескак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетневаяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнекскак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетневгак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетненеккак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьседеяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсекскак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсеськак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсентькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Def.Sg+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсентеньгак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьседентькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсесэнтькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсестэнтькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсевантькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсевтементькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсешкантькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсексэнтькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнеяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетненьгак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнененьгак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнедеяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнесэяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнестэяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнескак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетневаяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнекскак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетневгак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетненеккак
